Hawaii statutes.
§159-29 Exemptions. (a) This chapter
requiring inspection of the slaughtering of animals and the preparation of the
carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products at establishments
conducting such operations shall not apply:

(1) To the slaughtering by any person of animals of
the person's own raising, and the preparation and transportation by the person
of the carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products of the animals
exclusively for use by the person, members of the person's household, and the
person's nonpaying guests and employees; provided that the slaughter of the
animals is performed in compliance with part II of chapter 146.

(2) To the custom slaughter by any person of cattle,
sheep, swine, or goats delivered by the owner thereof or the owner's agent for
slaughter, and the preparation by that slaughterer of the carcasses, parts
thereof, and meat or meat products of the animals exclusively for use, in the
household of the owner, by the owner, members of the owner's household, and the
owner's nonpaying guests and employees; nor:

(3) To the custom preparation by any person of
carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products derived from the slaughter
by any person of cattle, sheep, swine, or goats of the owner's own raising or
from exotic animals delivered by the owner thereof for that custom preparation,
and transportation of those custom prepared articles exclusively for use, in
the household of the owner, by the owner, members of the owner's household, and
the owner's nonpaying guests and employees.

(4) To the person engaging in custom operations at an
establishment at which inspection under this chapter is maintained; provided
that:

(A) Any carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or
meat products wherever handled on a custom basis, or any containers or packages
containing those articles, are separated at all times from carcasses, parts
thereof, and meat or meat products prepared for sale; and

(B) All articles prepared on a custom basis,
or any containers or packages containing such articles, are plainly marked
"not for sale" immediately after being prepared and kept so
identified until delivered to the owner.

A person conducting custom exempt operations
shall be registered with the board as a custom exempt operator under this paragraph
and obtain a permit for exemption from the board to conduct those operations.
The board may refuse, withdraw, or modify any permit for exemption under this
paragraph in its discretion whenever it determines the action is necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The custom slaughter of animals and
preparation of meat or meat products shall be conducted in accordance with the
sanitary conditions and the recordkeeping, registration, and disease control
provisions that the board may prescribe.

(c) The transportation by commercial carrier
of carcasses, parts thereof, or meat or meat products produced without
inspection under subsection (a) is prohibited, except under permit issued by
the board.

(d) This chapter requiring inspection of meat
or meat products shall not apply to operations of types traditionally and
usually conducted at retail stores and restaurants, when conducted at any
retail store or restaurant or similar retail-type establishment for sale at the
establishments in normal retail quantities or service of meat or meat products
to consumers; provided that the meat or meat products shall have been inspected
and passed previously in compliance with this chapter and that the preparation,
handling, and storage of meat or meat products is conducted in accordance with
the sanitary conditions that the board may prescribe.

(e) In order to accomplish the objectives of
this chapter, the board, by rule, may exempt operations which the board
determines would best be exempted to further the purposes of this chapter, to
the extent that the exemptions conform to the Federal Meat Inspection Act and
the regulations thereunder.

(f) The adulteration and misbranding
provisions of this chapter, other than the requirement of the official inspection
legend, shall apply to meat or meat products which are not required to be
inspected under this section. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 202, §1;
am L 1978, c 37, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 139, §7; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next